California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(l) (1) A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with Chapter 501 of the Statutes of 2011 no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon completion of the implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(m) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency
 regulations no later than 18 months following the completion of all necessary automation to implement this section. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(3) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall
 be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(n) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(o) Notwithstanding subdivision (n), the individual changes imposed by the act adding this section that result in a cost shall become operative only if necessary funds are appropriated for these changes in the annual Budget Act or another statute for these purposes.

(p) This section
 shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11450, as added by Section 3 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 715, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 798, Sec. 1.   (SB 1415)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section conditionally operative July 1, 2021, or later date, as prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.    Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.

(a) (1) (A)   Aid shall be paid for each needy family, which shall include all eligible children of each eligible applicant or recipient child and the parents of the children, but shall not include a fetus, or recipients of aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), qualified for aid under this chapter. In determining the amount of aid paid, and notwithstanding the minimum basic standards of adequate care specified in Section 11452, the family’s income, exclusive of any amounts considered exempt as income or paid pursuant to subdivision (e) or Section 11453.1, determined for the prospective semiannual period pursuant to Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, and then calculated pursuant
 to Section 11451.5, shall be deducted from the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2). In no case shall the amount of aid paid for each month exceed the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2), plus any special needs, as specified in subdivisions (c), (e), and (f):Number of
eligible needy
persons in
the same homeMaximum
aid 1$ 326 2 535 3 663 4 788 5 899 6 1,010 7 1,109 8 1,209 9 1,30610 or more 1,403(B) If, when, and during those times that the United States government increases or decreases its contributions in assistance of needy children in this state above or below the amount paid on July 1, 1972, the amounts
 specified in the above table shall be increased or decreased by an amount equal to that increase or decrease by the United States government, provided that no increase or decrease shall be subject to subsequent adjustment pursuant to Section 11453.

(2) The sums specified in paragraph (1) shall not be adjusted for cost of living for the 1990–91, 1991–92, 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96, 1996–97, and 1997–98 fiscal years, and through October 31, 1998, nor shall that amount be included in the base for calculating any cost-of-living increases for any fiscal year thereafter. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of former Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(b) (1) (A) Until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant child who is 18 years of age or younger at any time after verification of pregnancy, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant child and the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), and until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person for the month in which the birth is anticipated
 and
 for the six-month period immediately prior to the month in which the birth is anticipated, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy is required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person as of the date of the application for aid, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person or the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a condition
 of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(B) A pregnant person may provide verification of pregnancy as required in subparagraph (A) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(C) (i) A person who receives aid pursuant to this paragraph shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 30 days following the end of their
 pregnancy.

(ii) Aid for persons under this paragraph shall discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which the person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.

(iii) Prior to discontinuing aid for a person under this paragraph due to the end of their pregnancy, the county human services agency shall provide information about, and referral to, mental health services, including, but not limited to, services provided by the county human services agency, when appropriate.

(D) This paragraph shall take effect on July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to
 implement this paragraph, whichever date is later.

(c) (1) The amount of forty-seven dollars ($47) per month shall be paid to a pregnant person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) or (b) to meet the special needs resulting from pregnancy if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. The county human services agency shall require a pregnant person to provide medical verification of pregnancy. The county human services agency shall refer all recipients of aid under this subdivision to a local provider of the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, and perinatal home visiting services administered by the county public health agency, county human services agency, or applicable county home visiting provider. If that payment to a pregnant
 person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) is considered income under federal law in the first five months of pregnancy, payments under this subdivision do not apply to a person eligible under subdivision (a), except for the month in which birth is anticipated and for the three-month period immediately prior to the month in which delivery is anticipated, if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter.

(2) A pregnant person may provide the verification of pregnancy required by paragraph (1) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for the pregnancy special need benefit to continue. If the pregnant person fails to submit
 medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue the benefit when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(3) Beginning May 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in paragraph (1) shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per month.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in this subdivision shall
 discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which a person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.

(d) For children receiving AFDC-FC under this chapter, there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month that, if added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Section 11460, 11461, 11462, or 11463. In addition, the child is eligible for special needs, as specified in departmental regulations.

(e) In addition to the amounts payable under subdivision (a) and former Section 11453.1, a family is entitled to receive an allowance for recurring special needs not common to a majority of recipients. These recurring special needs include, but are not limited to, special diets
 upon the recommendation of a physician for circumstances other than pregnancy, and unusual costs of
 transportation, laundry, housekeeping services, telephone, and utilities. The recurring special needs allowance for each family per month shall not exceed that amount resulting from multiplying the sum of fifteen dollars ($15) by the number of recipients in the family who are eligible for assistance.

(f) (1) After a family has used all available liquid resources, both exempt and nonexempt, in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), with the exception of funds deposited in a restricted account described in subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2, the family is also entitled to receive an allowance for nonrecurring special needs. This paragraph does not apply to the allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless assistance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(2) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs shall be granted for replacement of clothing and household equipment and for emergency housing needs other than those needs addressed by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3). These needs shall be caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the needy family. The department shall establish the allowance for each of the nonrecurring special needs items. The sum of all nonrecurring special needs provided by this subdivision shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per event.

(3) (A) (i) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless assistance is available to a family that is homeless and seeking shelter when the family is eligible for aid under this chapter.

(ii) (I) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that are apparently eligible for aid under this chapter. Apparent eligibility exists when evidence presented by the applicant, or that is otherwise available to the county human services agency, and the information provided on the application documents indicate that there would be eligibility for aid under this chapter if the evidence and information were verified. However, a noncitizen applicant who does not provide verification of their eligible immigrant status, or a person with no eligible children who does not provide verification of their pregnancy, is not apparently eligible for purposes of this section.

(II) A pregnant person may
 provide verification of pregnancy, as required in subclause (I), by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(iii) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that would be eligible for aid under this chapter but for the fact that the only child or children in the family are in out-of-home placement pursuant to an order of the dependency court, if the
 family is receiving reunification services and the county determines that homeless assistance is necessary for reunification to occur.

(B) A family is considered homeless, for the purpose of this section, when the family lacks a fixed and regular nighttime residence, the family has a primary nighttime residence that is a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, or the family is residing in a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. A family is also considered homeless for the purpose of this section if the family has received a notice to pay rent or quit, or any notice that could lead to an eviction, regardless of the circumstances cited in the notice.

(4) (A) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit of eighty-five dollars ($85) a day shall be available to families of up to four members for the costs of temporary shelter, subject to the requirements of this paragraph. The fifth and additional members of the family shall each receive fifteen dollars ($15) per day, up to a daily maximum of one hundred forty-five dollars ($145). County human services agencies may increase the daily amount available for temporary shelter as necessary to secure the additional bedspace needed by the family.

(ii) This special needs benefit shall be granted or denied the same day as the family’s application for homeless assistance, and benefits shall be available for up to three working days. Upon applying for homeless assistance, the family shall provide a sworn statement
 that the family is homeless. If the family meets the criteria of questionable homelessness, which means that there is reason to suspect that the family has permanent housing, the county human services agency shall refer the family to its early fraud prevention and detection unit, if the county has such a unit, for assistance in the verification of homelessness within this period.

(iii) After homelessness has been verified, the three-day limit shall be extended for a period of time that, when added to the initial benefits provided, does not exceed a total of 16 calendar days. This extension of benefits shall be done in increments of one week, and shall be based upon searching for permanent housing, which shall be documented on a housing search form, good cause, or other circumstances defined by the department. Documentation of a housing search
 is required for the initial extension of benefits beyond the three-day limit and on a weekly basis thereafter if the family is receiving temporary shelter benefits. Good cause shall include, but is not limited to, situations in which the county human services agency has determined that the family, to the extent it is capable, has made a good faith but unsuccessful effort to secure permanent housing while receiving temporary shelter benefits or that the family is homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(iv) Notwithstanding clauses (ii) and (iii), the county may waive the three-day limit and may provide benefits in increments of more than one week for a family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(B) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is available to pay for last month’s rent and security deposits if these payments are conditions of securing a residence, or to pay for up to two months of rent arrearages, if these payments are a reasonable condition of preventing eviction.

(ii) The last month’s rent or monthly arrearage portion of the payment shall meet both of the following requirements:

(I) (ia) It shall not exceed 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits or special needs benefit for a family of that size.

(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department
 notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph, the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(II) (ia) It shall only be made to families that have found permanent housing costing no more than 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits or special needs benefit for a family of that size.

(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph, the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support
 intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(iii) However, if the county human services agency determines that a family intends to reside with individuals who will be sharing housing costs, the county human services agency shall, in appropriate circumstances, set aside the condition specified in subclause (II) of clause (ii).

(C) The nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is also available to cover the standard costs of deposits for utilities that are necessary for the
 health and safety of the family.

(D) A payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance shall be issued no later than one working day from the time that a family presents evidence of the availability of permanent housing. If an applicant family provides evidence of the availability of permanent housing before the county human services agency has established eligibility for aid under this chapter, the county human services agency shall complete the eligibility determination so that the payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance is issued within one working day from the submission of evidence of the availability of permanent housing, unless the family has failed to provide all of the verification necessary to establish eligibility for aid under this chapter.

(E) (i) Except as provided in clauses (ii) and (iii), eligibility for the temporary shelter assistance and the permanent housing assistance pursuant to this paragraph is limited to the number of days allowable under subparagraph (A) for temporary shelter assistance and one payment of permanent housing assistance every 12 months. A person who applies for homeless assistance benefits shall be informed that, with certain exceptions, the temporary shelter benefit is limited to the number of days allowable under subparagraph (A) for the 12-month period.

(ii) (I) A family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster is eligible for homeless assistance.

(II) If there is a state or
 federally declared disaster in a county, the county human services agency shall coordinate with public and private disaster response organizations and agencies to identify and inform recipients of their eligibility for homeless assistance available pursuant to subclause (H).

(iii) A family is eligible for homeless assistance if homelessness is a direct result of domestic violence by a spouse, partner, or roommate, including, but not limited to, a parent or child with whom they were living; physical or mental illness that is medically verified that shall not include a diagnosis of alcoholism, drug addiction, or psychological stress; or the uninhabitability of the former residence caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the family, including natural catastrophe, fire, or condemnation. These circumstances shall be verified by
 a third-party governmental or private health and human services agency, except that domestic violence may also be verified by a sworn statement by the victim, as provided under Section 11495.25. Homeless assistance payments based on these specific circumstances may not be received more often than once in any 12-month period. In addition, if the domestic violence is verified by a sworn statement by the victim, the homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days of temporary shelter assistance and two payments of permanent housing assistance. A county may require that a recipient of homeless assistance benefits who qualifies under this paragraph for a second time in a 24-month period participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan as a condition of eligibility for homeless assistance benefits, but only if the county has also provided
 a housing navigation caseworker who can assist with securing permanent housing and housing case management services. The county human services agency shall immediately inform recipients who verify domestic violence by a sworn statement of the availability of domestic violence counseling and services, and refer those recipients to services upon request.

(iv) If a county requires a recipient who verifies domestic violence by a sworn statement to participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan pursuant to clause (iii), the plan shall include the provision of domestic violence services, if appropriate.

(v) If a recipient seeking homeless assistance based on domestic violence pursuant to clause (iii) has previously received homeless avoidance services based on domestic violence, the
 county shall review whether services were offered to the recipient and consider what additional services would assist the recipient in leaving the domestic violence situation.

(vi) The county human services agency shall report necessary data to the department through a statewide homeless assistance payment indicator system, as requested by the department, regarding all recipients of aid under this paragraph.

(F) Payments to providers for temporary shelter and permanent housing and utilities shall be made on behalf of families requesting these payments.

(G) The daily amount for the temporary shelter special needs benefit for homeless assistance may be increased if authorized by the current year’s Budget Act by
 specifying a different daily allowance and appropriating the funds therefor.

(H) A payment shall not be made pursuant to this paragraph unless the provider of housing is any of the following:

(i) A commercial establishment.

(ii) A shelter.

(iii) A person with whom, or an establishment with which, the family requesting assistance has executed a valid lease, sublease, or shared housing agreement.

(I) (i) A CalWORKs applicant who provides a sworn statement of past or present domestic abuse and who is fleeing their abuser is deemed to be homeless and is eligible for temporary shelter assistance
 under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) and under subparagraph (E), notwithstanding any income and assets attributable to the alleged abuser.

(ii) The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be granted the same day as the family’s application, and benefits shall be available in increments of 16 days of temporary shelter assistance pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A). The homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days each of temporary shelter assistance within the applicant’s lifetime. The second 16-day period shall continue to be available when the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient during the first 16-day period. The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be in addition to other payments for which the CalWORKs
 applicant, if the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient, may later qualify under this subdivision.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the housing search documentation described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be required only upon issuance of an immediate need payment pursuant to Section 11266 or the issuance of benefits for the month of application.

(g) The department shall establish rules and regulations ensuring the uniform statewide application of this section.

(h) The department shall notify all applicants and recipients of aid through the standardized application form that these benefits are available and shall provide an opportunity for recipients to apply for the funds quickly and efficiently.

(i) The department shall work with county human services agencies, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and advocates of CalWORKs recipients to gather information regarding the actual costs of a nightly shelter and best practices for transitioning families from a temporary shelter to permanent housing, and to provide that information to the Legislature, to be submitted annually in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(j) (1) Except for the purposes of Section 15200, the amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section 11453.1 shall not constitute part of the payment schedule set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) The amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section
 11453.1 shall not constitute income to recipients of aid under this section.

(k) For children receiving Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month, which, when added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Sections 11364 and 11387.

(l) (1) A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with Chapter 501 of the Statutes of 2011 no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon completion of the implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to
 the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(m) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations no later than 18 months following the completion of all necessary automation to implement this section. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(3) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial
 emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(n) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 798, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   (AB 2765)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing October 1, 1992, the maximum aid payments specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in effect on July 1, 1992, shall be reduced by 4.5 percent.

(b) (1) The department shall seek the approval from the United States Department of
 Health and Human Services that is necessary to reduce the maximum aid payments specified in subdivision (a) by an additional amount equal to 1.3 percent of the maximum aid payments specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in effect on July 1, 1992.

(2) The reduction provided by this subdivision shall be made on the first day of the month following 30 days after the date of approval by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 3.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.015.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payments in effect on June 30, 1993, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 as reduced by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11450.01, shall be reduced by 2.7 percent beginning the first of the month following 60 days after the enactment of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 4.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.017.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payment in effect on June 30, 1994, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 as reduced by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11450.01 and Section 11450.015, shall be reduced by 2.3 percent beginning the first of the month following 50 days after the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 5.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.018.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payment in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 as reduced by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section
 11450.01, Section 11450.015, and Section 11450.017, shall be reduced by 4.9 percent for counties in Region 2, as specified in Section 11452.018.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, through October 31, 1998, the maximum aid payment in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, as reduced by subdivision (a) and (b) of Section 11450.01, Section 11450.015, Section 11450.017, and subdivision (a) shall be reduced by 4.9 percent.

(c) Prior to implementing the reductions specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), the director shall apply for and obtain a waiver from the United States Department of Health and Human Services of Section 1396a(c)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The reduction shall be implemented to the extent the waiver is granted and only so long as the waiver is effective. This subdivision shall not apply if either the federal
 waiver process set forth at Section 1315 of Title 42 of the United States Code or Section 1396a(c) is repealed or modified such that a waiver is not necessary to implement subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) This section shall become operative and the reductions specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall commence on the first day of the month following 30 days after the receipt of federal approval or on the first day of the month following 30 days after a change in federal law that allows states to reduce aid payments without any risk to federal funding under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, whichever is earlier, but no earlier than October 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 132.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Amending action operative August 18, 1997, pursuant to Secs. 183 and 187 of Ch. 270.    Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

11450.019.

Effective the first day of the month following 90 days after a change in federal law that allows states to reduce aid payments without any risk to federal funding under Title XIX of the Social Security Act contained in Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, the reductions in maximum aid payments specified in Sections 11450.01, 11450.015, and 11450.017 shall not be applied when all of the parents or caretaker relatives of the aided child living in the home of the aided child meet one of the following
 conditions:

(a) The individual is disabled and receiving benefits under Section 12200 or 12300.

(b) The individual is a nonparent caretaker who is not included in the assistance unit with the child.

(c) The individual is disabled and is receiving State Disability Insurance benefits or Worker’s Compensation Temporary Disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 702.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.02.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing July 1, 2009, the maximum aid payments in effect September 1, 2007, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, shall be reduced by 4 percent.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1,
 2009, as specified in subdivision (a), shall be reduced by 8 percent, effective on June 1, 2011, or on the first day of the first month following 90 days after the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 21.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.021.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, effective April 1, 2019, the maximum aid payments pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in effect on July 1, 2018, shall be increased by 10 percent.

(b) The counties’ share of costs resulting from implementation of the increase to maximum aid payments pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to Section 15200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.022.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to increase CalWORKs maximum aid payment levels in the 2018–19, 2019–20, and 2020–21 fiscal years, or until the maximum aid payment levels reach 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the family size that is one greater than the assistance unit.

(b) As a first step toward this goal, the Legislature is adopting a 10-percent increase to the maximum aid payment levels to become effective April 1, 2019, as specified in Section 11450.021.

(c) For the second step, it is the intent of the Legislature to increase the maximum aid payment levels to close the gap by one-half between the maximum aid payment levels prior to taking the second step
 and 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the family size that is one greater than the assistance unit goal for that year.

(d) For the third step, it is the intent of the Legislature to increase the maximum aid payment levels to fully close the gap between the maximum aid payment levels prior to taking the third step and 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the family size that is one greater than the assistance unit goal for that year.
